District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1229

Public Access Corporation.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 30, 29 DCR 2872
renumbered and amended Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(dd), 30 DCR 4289
Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-195, § 2, 32 DCR 1022
Aug. 1, 1985, D.C. Law 6-15, § 2, 32 DCR 3570
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-213, § 2, 40 DCR 25
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1402, 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1829.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 802(b) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, 42 DCR 1652).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1302 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).